Hawaii, session 2025, HB349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that a better understanding of geothermal resources and carbon sequestration potential across the State can have multiple benefits. Resource characterization via slim-hole bores, which have a diameter of seven inches or less for over ninety per cent of the depth of the bore, can identify geothermal and carbon sequestration resources across the State. The legislature further finds that a statewide environmental assessment for a slim-hole resource characterization program should be conducted, along with robust and continued community engagement, in order to identify the most appropriate locations for this scientific activity. The purpose of this Act is to require the Hawaii state energy office to conduct a statewide environmental assessment for, and subsequently administer, a slim-hole resource characterization program to identify geothermal and carbon sequestration resources in the State. SECTION 2.  Chapter 196, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§196-     Carbon sequestration and underground resource characterization program.  (a)  The Hawaii state energy office shall conduct a statewide environmental assessment for a slim-hole resource characterization program that identifies the location and characteristics of underground geothermal and carbon sequestration resources across the State.  In accordance with the statewide environmental assessment, the Hawaii state energy office shall administer the slim-hole resource characterization program. (b) Before and during the environmental assessment and slim-hole resource characterization program, the Hawaii state energy office shall engage with the counties and nearby communities, including individuals and civic organizations, in order to understand community needs, priorities, and concerns with regard to the program." SECTION 3.  The Hawaii state energy office shall submit a progress report to the legislature two years after the slim-hole resource characterization program has commenced and a final report to the legislature at the conclusion of the program.  The findings and reports shall be made available to the public in readily accessible formats, including commonly used mapping software. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the energy security special fund the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purposes of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii state energy office for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) permanent position to support the activities of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii state energy office for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________